South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1099.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Clemson University, relating to Parking and Traffic Regulations - Golf Carts, designated as Regulation Document Number 5433, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The proposed regulation changes will update procedures and traffic regulations related to the parking and operation, including nighttime operation, of golf carts used by students, visitors, employees, etc., on the University's main campus. New language added to this section is intended to increase overall public safety and provide greater clarification on standards and compliance required to maintain public safety on campus as it relates to golf cart operation. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on July 25, 2025. ----XX----